Utah statutes.
4-5-7.   Adulterated food specified.
A food is adulterated:
(1) (a)  if it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that
may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added
substance the food may not be considered adulterated under this Subsection
(1)(a) if the quantity of the substance in such food does not ordinarily
render it injurious to health;
(b) (i)  if it bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious
substance other than one that is:
(A)  a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;
(B)  a food additive; or
(C)  a color additive that is unsafe within the meaning of Subsection
4-5-11(1); or
(ii)  if it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a
pesticide chemical that is unsafe within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. Sec. 346a;
or
(iii)  if it is or it bears or contains any food additive that is unsafe
within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. Sec. 348; provided that where a pesticide
chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity
with an exemption granted or tolerance prescribed under 21 U.S.C. 346a and the
raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such as canning,
cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling the residue of such pesticide
chemical remaining in or on such processed food shall, notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 4-5-11 and this Subsection (1)(b)(iii), not be
considered unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has
been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice, and the
concentration of such residue in the processed food when ready to eat is not
greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity;
(c)  if it consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy,
putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for food;
(d)  if it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary
conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it
may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health;
(e)  if it is, in whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or an
animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter, or of an animal that has
been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse;
(f)  if its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or
deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health;
(g)  if it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of
the radiation was in conformity with a rule or exemption in effect pursuant to
Section 4-5-11, or 21 U.S.C. Sec. 348; or
(h)  in meat or meat products are adulterated:
(i)  if such products are in casings, packages, or wrappers through which any
part of their contents can be seen and which, or the markings of which, are
colored red or any other color so as to be misleading or deceptive with
respect to the color, quality, or kind of such products to which they are
applied; or
(ii)  if such products contain or bear any color additive;
(2) (a)  if any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or
abstracted therefrom;
(b)  if any substance has been substituted wholly or in part therefor;
(c)  if damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or
(d)  if any substance has been added or mixed or packed therewith so as to
increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength or make it
appear better or of greater value than it is; or
(3)  if it is confectionery, and:
(a)  has partially or completely imbedded therein any nonnutritive object;
provided that this Subsection (3)(a) does not apply in the case of any
nonnutritive objective if, in the judgment of the department such object is of
practical functional value to the confectionery product and would not render
the product injurious or hazardous to health;
(b)  bears or contains any alcohol other than alcohol not in excess of .05% by
volume derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts; or
(c)  bears or contains any nonnutritive substance; provided, that this
Subsection (3)(c) does not apply to a safe nonnutritive substance that is in
or on confectionery by reason of its use for some practical functional purpose
in the manufacture, packaging, or storing of such confectionery if the use of
the substance does not promote deception of the consumer or otherwise result
in adulteration or misbranding in violation of this chapter.
(4)  The department may, for the purpose of avoiding or resolving uncertainty
as to the application of Subsection (3)(c), issue rules allowing or
prohibiting the use of particular nonnutritive substances.
